Idaho, session 2026, H0793.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 23-940, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
23-940. ALCOHOL BEVERAGE CONTROL FUND. (1) There is hereby created in
the state treasury the alcohol beverage control fund. All moneys from li-
cense and transfer fees that are collected by the director pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter, as well as any collections from the beer excise
tax as provided in section 23-1008, Idaho Code, shall be paid over to the
state treasurer for deposit in the alcohol beverage control fund. Expendi-
tures of moneys in the fund shall be subject to legislative appropriation for
the use of the Idaho state police alcohol beverage control bureau in carrying
out the provisions of title 23, Idaho Code, and the rules promulgated by the
director thereunder. At the beginning of each fiscal year, those moneys in
the alcohol beverage control fund that exceed two hundred percent (200%) of
that fiscal year appropriation, as certified by the state treasurer, shall
be transferred to the general fund.
(2) All other moneys collected by the director pursuant to the provi-
sions of this chapter shall be paid over to the state treasurer for deposit in
the general fund.
SECTION 2. That Section 23-1008, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
23-1008. TAX -- DISTRIBUTION -- RULES -- REPORTS. (1) A tax of four
dollars and sixty-five cents ($4.65) per barrel of thirty-one (31) gallons,
and a like rate for any other quantity or fraction thereof, is hereby levied
and imposed on each and every barrel of beer containing not more than five
percent (5%) of alcohol by volume sold for use within the state of Idaho.
A tax of thirteen dollars and ninety-five cents ($13.95) per barrel of
thirty-one (31) gallons, and a like rate for any other quantity or fraction
thereof, is hereby levied and imposed on each and every barrel of beer con-
taining more than five percent (5%) of alcohol by volume.
Any wholesaler who shall sell beer, upon which the tax herein imposed
has not been paid, and any person who shall purchase, receive, transport,
store or sell any beer upon which the tax herein imposed has not been paid
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and any beer so purchased, received, trans-


ported, stored or possessed or sold shall be subject to seizure by the com-
mission, any inspector or investigator of the commission, or by any sheriff,
constable or other police officer, and the same may be removed and kept for
evidence. Upon conviction of any person for violation of the provisions of
this section, the said beer, and all barrels, kegs, cases, cartons and cans
containing the same, shall be forfeited to the state of Idaho, and, in addi-
tion, the person so convicted shall be subject to the other penalties in this
chapter prescribed.
Beer and all barrels, kegs, cases, cartons or cans so forfeited to
the state of Idaho shall be sold by the commission at public auction to any
brewer, wholesaler, or retailer licensed under the provisions of this chap-
ter making the highest bid. Such sale shall be held at such place and time as
may be designated by the commission after reasonable notice thereof given
in such manner and for such time as the commission may by rule prescribe.
From the purchase price received upon such sale, the commission shall first
deduct an amount sufficient to pay the tax due on such beer and to pay all
costs incurred in connection with such sale. The commission shall deposit
the balance remaining with the state treasurer, who shall place the same in
the general fund of the state of Idaho, and it shall become a part thereof.
(2) The revenues received from the taxes, interest, penalties, or defi-
ciency payments imposed by this section shall be distributed as follows:
(a) An amount of money shall be distributed to the state refund account
sufficient to pay current refund claims. All refunds authorized by law
to be paid by the state tax commission shall be paid through the state
refund account and those moneys are continuously appropriated.
(b) For revenue deriving from beer containing not more than five per-
cent (5%) of alcohol by volume, the balance remaining after distribut-
ing the amount in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be distributed
as follows:
(i) Twenty percent (20%) shall be distributed to the substance
abuse treatment fund, which is created in section 23-408, Idaho
Code;
(ii) Thirty-three percent (33%) shall be distributed to the
permanent building fund Idaho state police, of which no less than
sixty percent (60%) shall be dedicated to the Idaho law enforce-
ment fund for use in the project choice program, as established in
section 49-454, Idaho Code, and no more than forty percent (40%) to
the alcohol beverage control fund; and
(iii) The remainder shall be distributed to the general fund.
(c) For revenue deriving from beer containing more than five percent
(5%) of alcohol by volume, the balance remaining after distributing the
amount in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be distributed as fol-
lows:
(i) Twelve percent (12%) shall be distributed to the substance
abuse treatment fund created in section 23-408, Idaho Code;
(ii) In fiscal year 2022 only, one and one-half percent (1.5%)
shall be distributed to the Idaho hop grower's commission fund
created in section 22-3112, Idaho Code, and three and one-half
percent (3.5%) shall be distributed to the Idaho grape growers and
wine producers account created in section 54-3607, Idaho Code.


In fiscal year 2023 only, three and one-half percent (3.5%) shall
be distributed to the Idaho hop grower's commission fund, and
one and one-half percent (1.5%) shall be distributed to the Idaho
grape growers and wine producers account. In fiscal year 2024 and
each fiscal year thereafter, five Five percent (5%) shall be dis-
tributed to the Idaho hop grower's commission fund; and
(iii) The remainder shall be distributed to the general fund.
(3) The commission is empowered to prescribe rules:
(a) For reports by carriers for hire and also all other carriers owned
and/or employed, directly or indirectly, by out-of-state brewers,
dealers or other persons, of all deliveries of beer in and into the state
of Idaho, stating especially the origin and destination of the beer, the
quantity thereof, and also the names and addresses, respectively, of
the consignors and consignees.
(b) For reports by out-of-state brewers and manufacturers of beer, of
all shipments by them of beer into the state of Idaho, stating espe-
cially the matters mentioned in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.